Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 2
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE LAW

Sec.

§ 56-201. Definitions.

As used in this act:

“State department” means the state department of health and welfare;

“Director” means the director of the department of health and welfare;

“Public welfare” means public assistance and social services;

“Social services” means activities of the department in efforts to bring about economic, social and vocational adjustment of families and persons;

“Public assistance” includes general assistance, old-age assistance, aid to the blind, assistance to families with children, aid to the disabled, and medical assistance;

“General assistance” means direct assistance in cash, direct assistance in kind, and supplementary assistance;

“Direct assistance in cash” means money payments to eligible people not classified as old-age assistance, or aid to the blind, or assistance to families with children, or aid to the disabled, or medical assistance;

“Direct assistance in kind” means payments to others on behalf of a person or family for food, rent, clothing, and other normal subsistence needs;

“Supplementary assistance” means payments to others on behalf of a person or family for transportation and costs incidental to vocational adjustment or employment;

“Old-age assistance” means money payments to or on behalf of needy aged people;

“Aid to the blind” means money payments to or on behalf of blind people who are needy;

“Assistance to families with children” means money payments, direct assistance in kind, supplementary assistance, and social services targeted toward self-sufficiency with respect to or on behalf of eligible families with children;

“Aged” means any person sixty-five (65) years or older;

“Aid to the disabled” means money payments to or on behalf of needy individuals who are disabled, and whose disability prevents self-support through employment for a period of at least one (1) year from the date of onset of the disability;

“Medical assistance” means payments for part or all of the cost of such care and services allowable within the scope of title XIX of the federal social security act as amended as may be designated by department rule;

“Provider” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation or organization, public or private, who provides residential or assisted living services, certified family home services, nursing facility services, services offered pursuant to the medicaid program, or services offered pursuant to titles IV or XX of the social security act;

“Needy” means the condition where a person or family does not have income and available resources in accordance with the provisions of section 56-210, Idaho Code.

§ 56-202. Duties of director of state department of health and welfare.

The director of the state department of health and welfare shall:

Administer public assistance and social services to eligible people;

Promulgate, adopt and enforce such rules and such methods of administration as may be necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of title 56, Idaho Code, except as provided in section 56-203A, Idaho Code;

Conduct research and compile statistics relating to public welfare;

Prepare for the governor and legislature an annual report of activities and expenditures; make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government may from time to time require; and comply with such provisions as the federal government may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;

Cooperate with the federal government through its appropriate agency or instrumentality in establishing, extending, and strengthening services for the protection and care of homeless, dependent, and neglected children, and children in danger of becoming delinquent; and to undertake other services for children authorized by law;

Cooperate with the federal government through its appropriate agency or instrumentality in establishing and maintaining a comprehensive system of in-home services as defined in section 67-5006, Idaho Code, designed to assist older persons, as defined in section 67-5006, Idaho Code, of Idaho to continue living in an independent and dignified home environment and to undertake other services for older persons as authorized by law;

Exercise the opt out provision in section 115 of the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, P.L. 104-193. Consistent with this, the department may provide food stamps and services funded under title 4A (including cash assistance, TANF supportive services and at risk payments) to a person who has been convicted of a felony involving a controlled substance as defined in chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code, if they comply with the terms of a withheld judgment, probation or parole.

§ 56-203. Powers of state department.

The state department shall have the power to:

Enter into contracts and agreements with the federal government through its appropriate agency or instrumentality whereby the state of Idaho shall receive federal grants-in-aid or other benefits for public assistance or public welfare purposes under any act or acts of congress heretofore or hereafter enacted;

Cooperate with the federal government in carrying out the purposes of any federal acts pertaining to public assistance or welfare services, and in other matters of mutual concern;

Cooperate with county governments and other branches of government and other agencies, public or private, in administering and furnishing public welfare services;

Enter into reciprocal agreements with other states relative to the provisions of public assistance and welfare services to residents and nonresidents;

Initiate and administer public assistance and social services for persons with physical or mental disabilities;

Establish such requirements of residence for public assistance under this act as may be deemed advisable, subject to any limitations imposed in this act;

Define persons entitled to medical assistance in such terms as will meet requirements for federal financial participation in medical assistance payments;

Accept the legal custody of children committed to it by district courts of this state under the Child Protective Act, to provide protective supervision as defined therein, to place children for adoption when such children are in the legal custody of the state department and are legally available for adoption and to exercise consent to adoption when the authority to do so is vested in the department by court order or legally authorized parental relinquishment;

Determine the amount, duration and scope of care and services to be purchased as medical assistance on behalf of needy eligible individuals;

Manage and operate the southwest Idaho treatment center at Nampa, Idaho.

§ 56-203A. Authority of department to enforce child support — Support enforcement services.

Whenever the department receives an application for public assistance on behalf of a child and it shall appear to the satisfaction of the department that said child has been abandoned by its parents, or that the child and one (1) parent have been abandoned by the other parent, or that the parent or other person who has a responsibility for the care, support or maintenance of such child has failed or neglected to give proper care or support to such child, the department shall take appropriate action under the provisions of this chapter, the abandonment or nonsupport statutes, or other appropriate statutes of this state to ensure that such parent or other person responsible shall pay for the care, support or maintenance of said dependent child.

The department may accept applications for support enforcement services on behalf of persons who are not recipients of public assistance and may take action as it deems appropriate to establish, modify or enforce support obligations against persons owing a duty to pay support. Action to establish support obligations may be taken under the abandonment or nonsupport statutes or other appropriate statutes of this state.

The department may charge fees to compensate it for services rendered in establishment of or enforcement of support obligations. The director shall, by rule, establish reasonable fees for support enforcement services, and said schedules of fees shall be made available to all applicants for support enforcement services. The department may, on showing of necessity, waive or defer any such fee.

Effective October 1, 1998, the department shall maintain a state case registry that contains records of each case in which enforcement services are being provided under this section and each child support order established or modified in the state from and after that date. Effective the same date, the department shall collect and disburse payments for all support orders related to cases for which services are provided under this section and each child support order established or modified after January 1, 1994, that is subject to income withholding orders. For child support orders established prior to January 1, 1994, at the option of each county and upon payment of the cost of the service, the department shall collect and disburse payments.

§ 56-203B. Payment of public assistance for child constitutes debt to department by parents — Limitations — Department subrogated to rights.

Any payment of public assistance money made to or for the benefit of any dependent child or children creates a debt due or owing to the department by the parent or others who are responsible for support of such children in an amount equal to the support obligation as is subsequently determined by court order pursuant to the Idaho child support guidelines which debt arises at the end of the first month for which the payment of public assistance commences. If a judgment entered by the court under the Idaho child support guidelines is more than the public assistance expended, the amount in excess of the public assistance expended shall be payable to the custodial parent or caretaker. Provided, that where there has been a district court order, the debt shall be limited to the amount provided for by said order. The department shall have the right to petition the appropriate district court for modification of a district court order on the same grounds as a party to said cause. Where a child has been placed in foster care, and a written agreement for payment of support has been entered into by the responsible parent or parents and the department, the debt shall be limited to the amount provided for in said agreement. Provided, that if a court order for support is or has been entered, the provisions of said order shall prevail over the agreement.

The department shall be subrogated to the right of said child or children or person having the care, custody and control of said child or children to prosecute or maintain any support action existing under the laws of the state of Idaho to obtain reimbursement of moneys thus expended. If a district court order enters judgment for an amount of support to be paid by an obligor parent, the department shall be subrogated to the debt created by such order, and said money judgment shall be deemed to be in favor of the department. This subrogation shall specifically be applicable to temporary spouse support orders, family maintenance orders and alimony orders up to the amount paid by the department in public assistance moneys to or for the benefit of a dependent child or children but allocated to the benefit of said children on the basis of providing necessities for the caretaker of said children.

Debt under this section shall not be incurred by, nor at any time be collected from a parent or other person who would be or is eligible for or who is the recipient of public assistance moneys for the benefit of minor dependent children for the period such person or persons are in such status and the collection of the debt from such person would not be in the fiscal interest of the state or would not be in the best interest of the child(ren) for whom such person owes support.

§ 56-203C. Powers of department.

In order to carry out its responsibilities imposed under this chapter and title IV-D of the social security act, the state department of health and welfare, through the attorney general or the respective county prosecuting attorney, or through private counsel is hereby authorized to take the following action:

Petition to establish an order for support including medical support and support for a period during which a child received public assistance;

Petition to establish paternity and order genetic testing of any individual involved in the paternity action;

Petition to modify an order for support in accordance with the Idaho child support guidelines at the request of an obligor, obligee or state agency providing services under title IV-D of the social security act;

Petition to enforce an order for support of a child or a spouse or former spouse who is living with a child for whom the individual also owes support; and

Intervene in a divorce or separate maintenance action or proceedings supplemental thereto, for the purpose of advising the court regarding support of a child or advising the court as to the financial interest of the state of Idaho therein without necessity of further leave of the court.

Other services as required by title IV-D of the social security act.

The department of health and welfare is not authorized to provide services regarding visitation or custody of a child unless so authorized by title IV-D of the social security act.

In any action taken under this section, the prevailing party may, at the discretion of the court, be allowed reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to be set by the court.

§ 56-203D. Set-off procedure for child support debt.

The state tax commission shall withhold and set-off any income tax or tax credit refund of any taxpayer upon notification from the department of health and welfare to collect any unpaid child support, including a judgment for reimbursement of public assistance, or unpaid spousal support. The state tax commission shall also withhold and set-off any income tax or tax credit refund of any taxpayer upon notification from the department of health and welfare to collect any payment received from a third party for the costs of health services to a child by a person who is required by court or administrative order to provide the costs of health services to a child and such payment has not been used to reimburse either the other parent or guardian of such child, the provider of such services, or the state agency, to the extent necessary to reimburse the other parent, guardian, provider or state agency for such costs. Any claims for current or past-due child support shall take priority over any such claims for the costs of such health services. The set-off or withholding of a refund due a taxpayer shall be completed only after the following conditions have been met:

A delinquency exists, which shall be defined as any unpaid child or spousal support including public assistance, pursuant to a court order from this state or a court or administrative order of another state.

All outstanding tax liabilities collectible by the state tax commission are satisfied.

The department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement, shall forward to the state tax commission the full name and social security number of the taxpayer. The tax commission shall notify the department of health and welfare of the amount of refund due the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s address on the income tax return.

Notice of the proposed set-off shall be sent by registered or certified mail to the taxpayer at the address listed on the income tax return. Within fourteen (14) days after such notice has been mailed (not counting Saturday, Sunday or state holidays as the 14th day) the taxpayer may file a protest in writing requesting a hearing before the department of health and welfare. The hearing shall be held within thirty-five (35) days from the date of the mailing of the original notice. No issues at that hearing may be considered that have been litigated previously. The department of health and welfare shall issue its findings and decision either at the hearing or by mail to the taxpayer within ten (10) days of the hearing.

When set-off is attempted on a joint return under the provisions of this section the taxpayer not specified to be the obligor in the claim may protest under the provisions of subsection (1)(d) of this section, and the set-off will be limited to one-half (1/2) of the joint refund.

After the decision of the department of health and welfare is issued, or if the taxpayer has failed to file a timely protest of the claim, the set-off procedure shall become final.

The proceeds from the set-off shall be credited to an account designated by the department of health and welfare, and notice shall be given to the appropriate clerk of the district court.

This procedure for set-off shall not be subject to section 67-1021 [67-1026], Idaho Code.

Any information furnished by the state tax commission, its employees or agents, under this section shall not be subject to the restrictions and penalties enumerated in section 63-3076, Idaho Code.

Upon request, the department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement, shall make the procedures established in this section for collecting child support arrears available to county prosecuting attorneys. The provisions of this subsection apply only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the requesting prosecuting attorney for the administrative costs incurred by the bureau which are attributable to the request.

§ 56-203E. Lottery prize set-off procedure for support debt.

The Idaho state lottery shall immediately withhold, set-off and transfer prize moneys of a lottery prize winner to the department of health and welfare upon notification and verification from the department of health and welfare to collect a support delinquency. The set-off or withholding of a prize shall be final only after the following conditions have been met:

A delinquency exists, which shall be defined as any unpaid child or spousal support including public assistance, pursuant to a court order from this state or a court or administrative order of another state.

The department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement, shall forward to the Idaho state lottery the full name and social security number of the obligor and the amount of the delinquent child support. The Idaho state lottery shall notify the department of health and welfare of the amount of the prize withheld to satisfy the child support delinquency and the prize winner’s address.

The department of health and welfare shall provide notice of the proposed set-off by registered or certified mail to the prize winner at the address provided to the Idaho state lottery. Within fourteen (14) days after such notice has been mailed (not counting Saturday, Sunday or state holidays as the 14th day) the prize winner may file a protest in writing requesting a hearing before the department of health and welfare. The hearing shall be held within thirty-five (35) days from the date of the mailing of the original notice. No issues at that hearing may be considered that have been litigated previously. The department of health and welfare shall issue its findings and decision either at the hearing or by mail to the prize winner within ten (10) days of the hearing.

After the decision of the department of health and welfare is issued, or if the prize winner has failed to file a timely protest of the claim, the set-off procedure shall become final.

The proceeds from the set-off shall be credited to an account designated by the department of health and welfare, and notice shall be given to the appropriate clerk of the district court.

§ 56-203F. Registration of foreign support orders.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state department of health and welfare shall register a family support order or family support agreement originating in a foreign country prior to taking enforcement action on the resulting family support obligation. A foreign support order or foreign support agreement shall be registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10, title 7, Idaho Code.

§ 56-204. Personnel. [Repealed.]

§ 56-204A. Services for children.

The state department is hereby authorized and directed to maintain, by the adoption of appropriate rules and regulations, activities which, through social casework and the use of other appropriate and available resources, shall embrace:

Protective services on behalf of children whose opportunities for normal physical, social and emotional growth and development are endangered for any reason;

Services for unmarried parents, which may be necessary to assure or provide adequate care, and to safeguard the rights and promote the well-being of such parents and their infants;

Services on behalf of children in their own homes to help overcome problems that may result in dependency, neglect or delinquency, and to strengthen parental care and supervision; and

Undertaking care of, and planning for children including those committed to the state department by the courts.

Receiving from any source and investigating all reasonable reports or complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation or cruel treatment of children;

Initiation of appropriate services and action where indicated with parents or other persons for the protection of children exposed to neglect, abuse, exploitation or cruel treatment;

Filing pleadings with appropriate courts in cases requiring court action;

Arrangements for prenatal care of unmarried expectant mothers and payment for such care when necessary for the well-being of the parents and infant;

Counseling with unmarried parents in relation to their plans for their children, including assisting parents to reach a decision concerning relinquishment through an understanding of what would be best for the child and themselves;

Services and assistance for minor unmarried parents;

Services on behalf of children in their own homes to strengthen parental care and supervision;

Specifying the conditions under which payment shall be made for the purchase of services and care for children, such as medical, psychiatric or psychological services and foster family or institutional care, group care, homemaker service, or day care;

Procedures to be observed in planning and caring for or placing for adoption a child committed to the state department following the termination of his parent-child relationship;

The establishment of appropriate administrative procedures for the conduct of administrative reviews and hearings as required by federal statute for all children committed to the department and placed in out of home care.

Such rules and regulations shall provide for:

§ 56-204B. Temporary shelter care.

The state department shall provide places of shelter as authorized by law for the placement of children for temporary care who have been brought into the custody of the magistrate courts or who have been taken into custody for their protection by peace officers. Such places of shelter may be maintained by the state department or may be licensed foster family homes or licensed foster institutional facilities employed or retained for shelter care by the state department.

§ 56-205. Issuance of SNAP benefits.

In each month that the state department or its authorized agent issues benefits under the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) to eligible persons, such benefits shall be issued over the course of not less than ten (10) consecutive days within the month.

To reduce the burden on state general funds, any implementation costs incurred by the department under subsection (1) of this section shall be paid using SNAP performance bonus money if such money is received from the United States department of agriculture. If the department does not receive sufficient SNAP performance bonus money, state general funds shall be requested to implement the provisions of this act. This act is dependent upon ongoing operating and personnel appropriations.

§ 56-206. General assistance.

Public assistance awarded under the terms of this act which is not classified as old-age assistance, or aid to the blind, or assistance to families with children, or aid to the disabled, or medical assistance, shall be designated as general assistance.

§ 56-207. Old-age assistance.

Old-age assistance shall be awarded to needy people who have attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, are residents of the state, and who are not inmates of public institutions at the time of receiving assistance except as patients in public medical institutions and who are not patients in any institution for tuberculosis or for mental diseases or who are not patients in any medical institution as a result of having been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis.

§ 56-208. Aid to the blind.

Aid to the blind shall be awarded to needy people who have no vision, or whose vision is so defective as to prevent the performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential, who are not receiving old-age assistance, and who are not inmates of public institutions at the time of receiving assistance.

§ 56-209. Assistance to families with children.

The director of the department is authorized to promulgate rules establishing assistance programs for eligible families, including temporary cash assistance, which will promote personal responsibility and self-sufficiency. The department shall define eligibility and other requirements of participation, and may establish time limitations, in conformity with federal law and regulation. The amount and duration of assistance shall be based on available funding.

§ 56-209a. Aid to the disabled.

Aid to the disabled shall be awarded to needy persons who are disabled and whose disability prevents self-support through employment for a period of at least one (1) year from the date of onset of the disability, but who are not inmates of public institutions (except as patients in medical institutions) and who are not patients in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases or who are not patients in any medical institution as a result of having been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis.

§ 56-209b. Medical assistance — Medical assistance account.

Medical assistance shall be awarded to persons as mandated by federal law; and medical assistance may be awarded to such other persons not required to be awarded medical assistance as mandated by federal law when such award is to the fiscal advantage of the state of Idaho.

There is hereby created in the dedicated fund the medical assistance account. The medical assistance account shall be an entity primarily designed to receive moneys from the families and relatives of patients receiving medical assistance under the state plan for medicaid, and to provide a source of moneys to pay for the state’s share of medical assistance expenses. Moneys in the medical assistance account may not be commingled with moneys in the cooperative welfare account [fund]. Moneys in the medical assistance account must be appropriated in order to be expended to pay for the state’s share of medical assistance expenses.

In all cases where the department of health and welfare through the medical assistance program has or will be required to pay medical expenses for a recipient and that recipient is entitled to recover any or all such medical expenses from any third party or entity, the department of health and welfare will be subrogated to the rights of the recipient to the extent of the amount of medical assistance benefits paid by the department as the result of the occurrence giving rise to the claim against the third party or entity.

If a recipient of medical assistance pursues a claim against a third party or entity through litigation or a settlement, the recipient will so notify the department. If a recipient fails to notify the department of such claim, the department may recover the amount of any public assistance obtained by the recipient while the recipient pursued such claim. In addition, if the recipient recovers funds, either by settlement or judgment, from such a third party or entity, the recipient shall reimburse the department to the extent of the funds received in settlement minus attorney’s fees and costs, the amount of the medical assistance benefits paid by the department on his behalf as a result of the occurrence giving rise to the need for medical assistance. The department shall be entitled to all the legal rights and powers of a creditor against a debtor in enforcing the recipient’s reimbursement obligation.

The department shall have priority to any amount received from a third party or entity which can reasonably be construed to compensate the recipient for the occurrence giving rise to the need for medical assistance, whether the settlement or judgment is obtained through the subrogation right of the department or through recovery by the recipient, and whether or not the recipient is made whole by the amount recovered. The department will be entitled to reimbursement of medical assistance benefits paid on behalf of the recipient arising from the incident or occurrence prior to any amount being distributed to the recipient. The department may notify such third party or entity of the department’s entitlement to receive the reimbursement prior to any amount being distributed to the recipient. Furthermore, the department may instruct the third party or entity to make such payment directly to the department prior to any amount being distributed to the recipient. Any third party or entity who distributed funds in violation of such a notice shall be liable to the department for the amount of the reimbursement.

§ 56-209c. Denial of payment for abortions under certain conditions.

No funds available to the department of health and welfare, by appropriation or otherwise, shall be used to pay for abortions, unless it is the recommendation of one (1) consulting physician that an abortion is necessary to save the life of the mother, or unless the pregnancy is a result of rape, as defined in section 18-6101, Idaho Code, or incest as determined by the courts.

§ 56-209d. Medical assistance program — Services to be provided — Experimental services or procedures excluded.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, medical assistance shall increase:

Payment as determined under rules established by the director from forty (40) days per fiscal year to unlimited days of inpatient hospital care per state fiscal year.

Payment as determined under rules established by the director from thirty dollars ($30.00) per month to an unlimited amount of prescribed drugs for each recipient.

Provision of eligibility for medical assistance for residents of skilled and intermediate care facilities who meet the medical criteria for medical assistance, from those with countable income of two hundred one and two-tenths percent (201.2%) to those with countable income of three hundred percent (300%) of the SSI standard.

Payment, as authorized by title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and as determined under rules established by the director for:

Durable medical equipment.

Soft organ transplants.

Adult dental services.

Adult vision services.

Adult hearing services.

Prosthetics.

Assistive and augmentative communication devices.

Payment for breast and cervical cancer-related treatment services for persons who are eligible for screening for these cancers under the federal centers for disease control and prevention’s national breast and cervical cancer early detection program, and are eligible for medical assistance pursuant to the provisions of the federal “Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000” (Pub. L. 106-354).

The cost of physician, hospital or other services deemed experimental are excluded from coverage. The director may allow coverage of procedures or services deemed investigational if the procedures or services are as cost effective as traditional, standard treatments.

§ 56-209e. Eligibility of married couples for medical assistance under the medicaid program.

It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section to reduce the number of situations in which medicaid regulations as they apply to long term care costs, cause either the destitution of the entire family, or a dissolution of marriage carried out to prevent destitution. It is further the intent of this section to protect the community and separate property rights, insofar as such rights are not specifically preempted by federal law, of a married person whose spouse applies for medical assistance regardless of whether they are living together.

In determining the eligibility of an aged, blind or disabled married individual or of a couple for medical assistance under title XIX of the social security act, the amount of income and resources to be counted as available to such individual or couple shall be calculated in accordance with the community property provisions of chapter 9, title 32, Idaho Code, or should it be to the advantage of such individual or couple, in accordance with the methods utilized by the federal supplemental security income program under title XVI of the social security act.
(2)(a) In determining the eligibility of an aged, blind or disabled married individual or of a couple for medical assistance under title XIX of the social security act, the amount of income and resources to be counted as available to such individual or couple shall be calculated in accordance with the community property provisions of chapter 9, title 32, Idaho Code, or should it be to the advantage of such individual or couple, in accordance with the methods utilized by the federal supplemental security income program under title XVI of the social security act.

Where both spouses are applying or are covered by medical assistance, the same method of counting income and resources shall be applied to both spouses and utilized to determine the liability of each for the cost of medical care; however, for any month for which either spouse receives a supplemental security income payment or a state supplement under section 56-207, 56-208 or 56-209a, Idaho Code, or for which an application is filed and subsequently approved, the methodology of the supplemental security income program shall be applied.

The presumption of the availability of income under either the community property or supplemental security income method may be rebutted by either spouse.

The department of health and welfare shall furnish to each married medical assistance applicant who is aged, blind or disabled, a clear and simple statement in writing advising them of the provisions of this section.

The provisions of paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection shall continue to apply on and after September 30, 1989, to married couples who are living together.
(e)(i) The provisions of paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection shall continue to apply on and after September 30, 1989, to married couples who are living together.

Beginning September 30, 1989, eligibility for any married person living in a medical institution whose spouse does not live in a medical institution, shall be determined by evaluating income first by attributing such income to the individual or individuals in whose name or names such income is paid, and if such attribution exceeds the maximum eligibility limit, secondly by attributing income in accordance with the community property provisions of chapter 9, title 32, Idaho Code.

Beginning September 30, 1989, the post eligibility treatment of income of any married person living in a medical institution whose spouse does not live in a medical institution, shall be in accordance with section 1924(b) and (d) of the social security act regardless of whether eligibility was determined in accordance with the name or names by which income was paid or in accordance with the community property provisions of chapter 9, title 32, Idaho Code.

The provisions of paragraphs (a), (b) and (d) of this subsection as they relate to resources shall continue to apply on and after September 30, 1989, to couples separated because one (1) spouse entered a medical institution for a continuous stay on or before September 29, 1989; and the provisions of section 1924(c) of the social security act shall apply to couples separated because one (1) spouse enters a medical institution for a continuous stay on or after September 30, 1989.
(3) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

§ 56-209f. State financial assistance program for medically indigent residents.

Beginning October 1, 1991, subject to the requirements and limitations of chapter 35, title 31, Idaho Code, the state shall fund the catastrophic health care cost program from the catastrophic health care cost account which shall provide financial assistance to medically indigent residents who are not eligible under the state plan for medicaid under title XIX of the social security act or medicare under title XVIII of that act, as amended.

§ 56-209g. Pharmacy reimbursement.

Medicaid pharmacy reimbursement levels are a combination of the cost of the drug and a dispensing fee which includes such pharmaceutical care services as counseling, obtaining a patient history, documentation and dispensing. Pharmacy reimbursement levels may be adjusted in accordance with rules promulgated by the director through negotiated rulemaking with interested parties including representatives of the pharmacy profession.

The department will pay the lesser of the provider’s lowest charge to the general public for a drug or the estimated acquisition cost (EAC) plus a dispensing fee.

The EAC is defined by the department as the average acquisition cost (AAC) of the drug, or when no AAC is available, reimbursement will be wholesale acquisition cost (WAC). WAC shall mean the price, paid by a wholesaler for the drugs purchased from the wholesaler’s supplier, typically the manufacturer of the drug as published by a recognized compendia of drug pricing on the last day of the calendar quarter that corresponds to the calendar quarter.

The department shall establish pharmacy dispensing fee payments based on the results of surveys of pharmacies and dispensing rates paid to other payers. The dispensing fee structure will be tiered, with the tiers based on the annual medicaid claims volume of the enrolled Idaho retail pharmacy. All other pharmacy dispensing fees will be the lowest dispensing fee for the tiered structure.

The AAC will be established by the department by state or national surveys to the pharmacy for the product. When surveys are requested by the department to pharmacies participating in the Idaho medicaid program, they are required to participate in these periodic state cost surveys by disclosing the costs of all drugs net of any special discounts or allowances. Participating pharmacies that refuse to respond to the periodic state surveys will be disenrolled as a medicaid provider.